Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1468YH (4) 91 jda/jh H.F. 150 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 279.87 Standards-based grading ââ 1 prohibition. 2 A school district shall not utilize standards-based grading 3 to evaluate the performance of students who are enrolled in 4 grades six through twelve. For purposes of this section, 5 âstandards-based gradingâ means a method of evaluating student 6 performance in which traditional academic subjects are broken 7 down into smaller learning objectives or skills and a studentâs 8 performance is evaluated based on the extent to which the 9 student has mastered each particular learning objective or 10 skill. 11